California statutes. Elections Code
For each statewide election, the Governor shall issue a proclamation calling the election. The proclamation shall be issued by the Governor under his or her hand and the Great Seal of the state no later than the 148th day prior to the election and shall state the time of the election and the offices, if any, to be filled. Copies of the proclamation shall be transmitted by the Governor to the boards of supervisors of the counties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

For a special local election, the governing body of the local agency shall issue a proclamation or a resolution calling the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Preelection Notices [12101. - 12113.]

12101.

(a) Not earlier than the 127th nor later than the 113th day before any municipal election to fill offices, the city elections official shall publish a notice of the election in the city pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. The notice shall be headed “Notice of Election,” and shall contain a statement of:

(1) The time of the election.

(2) The offices to be filled, specifying full term or short term, as the
 case may be.

(b) With respect to a special election to fill a vacancy in office, unless the city has enacted an ordinance as referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 10229, and the ordinance does not allow for appointment to fill the vacancy and requires the vacancy to be filled in the special election, the notice shall also state that if no one or only one person is nominated for an elected office, appointment to the elective office may be made as prescribed by Section 10229.

If there is no newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the city, the notice shall be typewritten and copies shall be posted conspicuously within the time prescribed in at least three public places in the city.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

The notice of the municipal election shall be substantially in the following form:

Notice is hereby given that a ____ (general or special) municipal election will be held in the ____ of ____ on ____, the ____ day of ____, 20__, for the following officers: (name them).

The polls will be open between the hours of __ m. and __ m.City Elections OfficialDated, _______, ___.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 13.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

At least 158 days before the direct primary, the Secretary of State shall prepare and transmit to each county elections official a notice designating all the offices, except those of county officers and judges, for which candidates are to be nominated.

At least 125 days before the direct primary election, the Secretary of State shall prepare and transmit to each county elections official a notice designating the political parties qualified to participate in the primary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

(a) A notice designating the offices for which candidates are to be nominated shall be in substantially the following form:NOTICE BY SECRETARY OF STATE OF OFFICES FOR WHICH CANDIDATES ARE TO BE NOMINATED AT THE DIRECT PRIMARY

Secretary of State

Sacramento,__. 20 __.To the County Elections Official of the County of ____:

Notice is hereby given that the offices for which candidates are to be nominated at the primary election to be held on the ____ day of___, 20__, together with the names of the
 political parties qualified to participate in the election, are as follows:STATE AND DISTRICT OFFICESCONGRESSIONAL OFFICESLEGISLATIVE
 OFFICES
Notice is also hereby given that at the primary election, candi–
dates are to be nominated for the following office:
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONNotice is also hereby given that at the primary election, in the county
 first above mentioned, candidates are to be nominated for any county offices or judicial offices to which candidates are to be elected at the ensuing general election;

And notice is also hereby given that at the primary election there shall be elected in each county a county central committee for each political party above named pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 7000) of the Elections Code.(seal)Secretary of State(b) The notice designating the political parties qualified to participate in this election for nomination of candidates shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE BY SECRETARY OF STATE OF POLITICAL PARTIES QUALIFIED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DIRECT PRIMARY ELECTION

Secretary of State

Sacramento, __. 20__.To the County Elections Official of the County of ____:

Notice is hereby given that the political parties qualified to participate
 in this election for nomination of candidates to partisan offices are as follows:
(seal)Secretary of State

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 14.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

(a) The elections official shall, not less than one week before the election, publish the list of the polling places designated for each election precinct.

(b) Publication shall be pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the jurisdiction where the election is to be held and in any newspaper of general circulation designated by the elections official. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the jurisdiction, the list shall be
 typewritten and copies shall be posted conspicuously within the time prescribed in at least three public places within the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.5.

(a) Not less than one week before the election, the elections official shall post a list of all current polling places in each precinct and a list of political party preference of precinct board members appointed by the 15th day before the election. This list shall not include the names of the precinct board members. Not later than 28 days after the election, the elections official shall post an updated list of the political party preferences of precinct board members who actually served on election day. The election official shall post these lists in their office and on their official website, if any.

(b) In each jurisdiction in which the election official determines that the public
 interest, convenience, and necessity requires the local posting of polling places, the elections official shall divide and distribute the lists for posting in any city clerk’s office within the jurisdiction having the election.

(c) Each list required by this section shall remain posted for 30 days after completion of the canvass, shall then be archived by the elections official, and shall remain available for public inspection as long as election materials are required to be retained. Copies
 shall be made available upon request for a price not to exceed the cost of reproduction and mailing.

(d) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.   (SB 1131)   Effective September 26, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.

(a) The elections official shall publish, as provided in this section and Section 12105, the list of polling places designated for each election precinct in each jurisdiction where the elections official determines that the public interest, convenience, and necessity require the local publication of the list to afford adequate notice of this subject to the electorate.

(b) After making a determination pursuant to subdivision (a), the elections official shall divide and distribute the list of polling places and cause the same to be published at least one week before the election in newspapers of general circulation published in different places in the
 jurisdiction.

(c) Divisions of the list of polling places may be published in that daily newspaper of general circulation published or circulated in one or more cities in the county, with the exception of the county seat, that is determined will give to the electorate in each city adequate notice of the election. If there is no daily newspaper, publication may be made in a semiweekly newspaper, a biweekly newspaper, or a weekly newspaper of general circulation that is determined will give the electorate in the city adequate notice of the election.

(d) The list of polling places designated for various portions of the unincorporated area of the county and of the county seat may be published in those daily, semiweekly, biweekly, or weekly newspapers of general circulation published
 or circulated within the various portions of the unincorporated area and the county seat, deemed by the county elections official to be those newspapers that will give adequate notice of the election to the voters of the respective portions of the unincorporated area and the county seat.

(e) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 29.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12107.

(a) The elections official shall let the contracts for publication, pursuant to Section 12106, of the list of polling places designated for each election precinct, and shall determine the rate to be paid for the publication of the list or any portion of the list.

(b) The publication rate shall be based on a common denominator of measurement for all newspapers and may be graduated according to circulation.

Contracts for the publication shall include the publication of the proper portion of the list of polling places and all other items relating to that portion required by law to be published.

(c) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 30.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12108.

(a) The elections official shall ascertain the name of the political party, if any, for which each precinct board member has expressed a preference, as shown in the affidavit of registration of that person. The elections official shall post a list of the board member’s party preference or an abbreviation of the name of each precinct board member. The list required under this section shall not include the names of the precinct board members. If a precinct board member has not expressed a preference for a political party, the word “None” shall be printed in place of the party name.

(b) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote
 centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 554, Sec. 4.   (SB 1131)   Effective September 26, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12109.

Whenever the ballots at any election or from any precincts are to be tallied at a central place and not at the precincts, the elections official or secretary of the jurisdiction conducting the election shall specify the public place to be used and give notice thereof as follows:

(a) By at least one publication in a newspaper of general circulation published in the jurisdiction where the election is to be held, provided that the publication is made at least 10 days before the day of the election.

(b) If a newspaper of general circulation is not published in that jurisdiction, then by prominently posting the notice in the office of the elections official for at least 10 days before the day of the election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12110.

In case of a municipal election to fill offices, the city elections official shall not later than one week before the election publish a list of the names of the nominees, in the order in which they appear on the ballot, and the respective offices for which they have been nominated. Publication shall be in the city in a newspaper of general circulation. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the city, the notice shall be typewritten and copies shall be posted conspicuously within the time prescribed in at least three public
 places in the city. This list shall be headed, “Nominees for Public Office,” in conspicuous type, and shall be substantially in the following form:

NOMINEES FOR PUBLIC OFFICE

Notice is hereby given that the following persons have been nominated for the offices mentioned below to be filled at the general municipal election to be held in the ____ of ____on ____ the ____ day of ____, 20__.

(Here follow with the list of nominees.)

Dated, ____City Elections Official

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 344, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12111.

(a) In case of a municipal election on any measure, the city elections official shall publish a synopsis of the measure at least one time not later than one week before the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the city. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the city, the notice shall be typewritten and copies shall be posted conspicuously within the time prescribed in at least three public places in the city.

The notice shall be headed “Measure To Be
 Voted On” in conspicuous type and shall be substantially in the following form:

MEASURE TO BE VOTED ON

Notice is hereby given that the following measure is to be voted on at the ____ (general or special) municipal election to be held in the City of ____, on Tuesday, the ____ day of ____, 2___.

(Synopsis of measure or measures)

Dated ____City Elections OfficialCity of ______________(b) The city elections official shall consolidate the notice of election and the notice of measure to be voted on
 into one notice if the measure was placed on the ballot before the notice of election is published pursuant to Section 12101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12112.

(a) At least 90 days, and not more than 120 days, before the day fixed for the general district election, the elections official of the principal county shall publish a notice of the election once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district or, if no such newspaper is published in the district, in a newspaper having general circulation in the district published in any affected county in the district. The notice shall contain the date of the general district election, name the offices for which candidates may file, and state
 the qualifications required by the principal act for each office. The notice shall state the location where official declarations of candidacy for eligible candidates desiring to file for any of the elective offices may be obtained, the office in which completed declarations of candidacy are required to be filed, and the date and time after which no declarations of candidacy may be accepted for filing. The notice shall state that appointment to each elective office will be made as prescribed by Section 10515 in the event there are no nominees or an insufficient number of nominees for the office and a petition for an election is not filed with the elections official within the time period prescribed by Section 10515.

(b) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), the county elections official shall, by a general press release, set forth both of the following:

(1) The
 elective offices of the district to be filled at the ensuing district election.

(2) A telephone number that voters of the district may utilize in order to obtain information regarding filing for the elective district office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12113.

For each school or special district, the county elections official immediately shall deliver a copy of all published notices to the district secretary. Each notice shall be posted in the district office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Precincts [12200. - 12288.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12200. - 12200.]

12200.

This chapter applies to all jurisdictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Precinct Formation [12220. - 12225.]

12220.

The elections official shall divide the jurisdiction into precincts and prepare detail maps or exterior descriptions thereof, or both, and as many copies as the elections official may determine. The county surveyor, if requested by an elections official, shall provide assistance to the elections official in the preparation of these maps or exterior descriptions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12221.

In any order establishing precincts, their boundaries shall be defined by reference to exterior descriptions or delineation thereof on a map or maps.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12222.

(a) No precinct shall be established so that its boundary crosses the boundary of any supervisorial district, congressional district, senatorial district, Assembly district, board of equalization district, judicial district, incorporated city, ward, or city council district.

(b) If, at any election, any precinct contains an insufficient number of qualified persons to make up a precinct board, the precinct may be consolidated with an adjoining
 precinct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   (AB 2692)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12223.

(a) Whenever a jurisdiction is divided into election precincts or whenever the boundary of an established precinct is changed or a new precinct is created, the precinct boundary shall be fixed in a manner so that the number of voters in the precinct does not exceed 1,000 on the 88th day prior to the day of election, unless otherwise provided by law.

(b) An elections official may
 subtract the number of permanent vote by mail voters, pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3200) of Division 3, from the total number of voters for purposes of complying with subdivision (a) if after subtracting the number of permanent vote by mail voters, the number of voters in the precinct does not exceed the percentage of nonpermanent vote by mail voters in the jurisdiction on the 88th day prior to the election multiplied by 1,000, unless otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.   (SB 1342)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12224.

(a) At the discretion of the elections official, the voters of the precinct may be divided into two or more groups, as nearly equal as possible, and one precinct board appointed to serve each group. When the voters of a precinct are so divided, there may be one or more polling places and a ballot box for and a set of returns from each group.

(b) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 32.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12225.

Whenever a precinct is entirely owned or controlled by the United States, and no permission is granted by the federal authorities for the establishment of precinct boards and polling places, precinct boards need not be appointed nor polling places designated, but in lieu thereof the elections official shall, not less than 88 days prior to election day, establish the precinct as a mail ballot precinct and conduct the election for that precinct in accordance with Section 3005.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Precinct Consolidations [12241. - 12241.]

12241.

(a) The elections official conducting local, special, or consolidated elections, or statewide elections other than the direct primary, presidential primary, or general election, for the purpose of the election, may divide the territory within which the election is to be held into special election or consolidated election precincts by consolidating existing precincts, or otherwise, subject to Section 12222, and may change and alter the precincts for those elections as often as occasion requires. Not more than six existing precincts may be consolidated into one special election or consolidated election precinct. The polling place used for a consolidated precinct shall be located within the boundaries of the consolidated precinct.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 904, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Precinct Boundary Changes [12260. - 12263.]

12260.

(a) The elections official may change or alter any precinct boundaries.

(b) If any changes or alterations are made the elections official shall prepare new detail maps or exterior descriptions thereof, or both. The county surveyor shall, if so requested, provide assistance to the elections official in the preparation of the detail maps or exterior descriptions.

(c) The elections official shall provide, at the request of any interested person, the following information:

(1) All precinct boundary changes and alterations made within the current calendar year and the immediately preceding two calendar years.

(2) All precinct consolidations made within the current calendar year and the immediately preceding two calendar years, specifying the election or elections in which the consolidations were made.

(d) The information provided to persons pursuant to subdivision (c) shall include the precinct numbers before the change or alteration and then a description, including precinct numbers, of the changes or alterations. The description may include maps.

(e) The information described in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall be compiled for each calendar year and shall be kept and filed so as to be accessible to any person upon request.

(f) The elections official may charge a person requesting information the amount needed to reimburse the jurisdiction for the actual expenses incurred in providing copies of the information required under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12261.

(a) The boundaries of precincts for the general election shall be the same as those established for the direct primary election, except to the extent necessary to add or subtract precincts as the result of population change or to divide precincts containing more than 1,000 voters or to change precinct boundaries due to jurisdictional boundary changes, or consolidations of elections. Changes of precinct boundaries may also be made when consolidating precincts.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 904, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12262.

Jurisdictional boundary changes occurring less than 125 days before an election shall not be effective for purposes of that election. Voters residing within an area affected by a boundary change, occurring within 125 days before an election, shall vote at the ensuing election in all respects as if a boundary change had not occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 118, Sec. 3.   (AB 1730)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12263.

The registrar of voters in each county shall make available, upon request by any member of the public, a map in digital form provided free of charge that shows the effective boundaries of each precinct within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   (AB 17)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Polling Places [12280. - 12288.]

12280.

When designating polling places, the elections official shall undertake necessary measures in the locating of polling places to ensure that polling places meet the guidelines promulgated by the Secretary of State for accessibility by the physically handicapped.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12281.

(a) If, for any valid reason, the polling place designated for any precinct cannot be used, and this fact is known in sufficient time to allow a mailed notice to be received before the election, the elections official may designate another polling place and shall mail, to each voter in the precinct a notice showing this change.

(b) If the information is not known in sufficient time for a mailing pursuant to subdivision (a), either the elections official or, in the case of an emergency, the precinct board on the day of election, shall designate another polling place as near the place first designated as possible, post notice on or near the place first designated,
 and conduct the election at the new location.

(c) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 33.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12282.

Property exempted from taxation pursuant to Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be made available free of charge to the elections official for use as a polling place pursuant to Section 213.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12283.

(a) For purposes of this section, “public building” means a building owned or controlled by any of the following:

(1) A local governmental agency, including a city or county.

(2) The University of California.

(3) The California State University.

(4) A community college district.

(b) (1) The governing body having jurisdiction over school buildings or other public buildings may authorize the use of its buildings for polling places, or for vote centers, as described in Section 4005, beginning
 up to 10 days before the election and continuing through election day, and it may also authorize the use of its buildings, without cost, for the storage of voting machines and other vote-tabulating devices.

(2) If a city or county elections official specifically requests the use of a school building or public building for polling places, or vote centers beginning up to 10 days before the election and continuing through election day, as well as during key dates necessary for drop-off, set-up, and pick-up of election materials, as determined by the elections official, the governing body having jurisdiction over the particular school building or public building shall allow its use for the purpose requested, except that the University of California is encouraged, but not required, to comply with a request made pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) When allowing use of a school building for
 polling places or vote centers, the governing body may, but is not required to, do any of the following:

(A) Continue school in session, if the governing body identifies to the elections official making the request the specific areas of the school buildings not occupied by school activities that will be allowed for use as polling places or vote centers.

(B) Designate the day for staff training and development.

(C) Close the school to students and certificated employees.

(c) (1) An elections official requesting the use of a school building pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include in the official’s request a list of the schools from which the use of a building for polling places or vote centers is needed. Requests must be made
 within sufficient time in advance of the school year for the governing body to determine, on a school-by-school or districtwide basis, whether to keep the affected schools in session, designate the schoolday for staff training and development, or close the school to students and nonclassified employees before school calendars are printed and distributed to parents.

(2) An elections official requesting the use of a public building pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include in the official’s request a list of the buildings from which the use of a building for polling places or vote centers is needed. Requests shall be made sufficiently before election day for the governing body of the city, county, or other local governmental agency to adequately plan for the public building’s use as a polling place or vote center.

(d) (1) Once a governing body has approved the use of a school building or public building as a polling place or vote center, the governing body shall instruct the school district or other public administrator to provide the elections official a site with an adequate amount of space
 for voting operations and storage of associated supplies that will allow the precinct board or vote center to perform its duties in a manner that will not impede, interfere, or interrupt the normal process of voting and to make internet access available for use by local elections officials, if requested.

(2) Beginning 10 days before the election and continuing through election day, if requested by the elections official, the district administrator shall make building parking available at no charge to the precinct or vote center
 board and voters. If requested by the elections official, the district administrator shall also make accessible parking spaces and parking for assisting voters curbside available.

(e) A public building, including, but not limited to, a building operated by a school district, that is used as a polling place or vote center shall comply with applicable accessibility requirements described in this article, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   (AB 287)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12284.

Upon request of the elections official, state-owned buildings, parking lots, and other facilities shall be made available free of charge for use as polling places and vote centers, except that the Department of General Services may exclude from use as polling places or vote centers state facilities at which access to confidential materials cannot be reasonably safeguarded, which are inaccessible to the public, the use of which would disrupt state business, or which are otherwise impractical for use as polling places.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 343, Sec. 2.   (AB 2540)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12285.

A mobilehome may be used as a polling place if the elections official determines that no other facilities are available for the convenient exercise of voting rights by mobilehome park residents and the mobilehome is designated as a polling place by the elections official pursuant to Section 12286. No rental agreement shall prohibit the use of a mobilehome for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12286.

(a) At least 29 days prior to the election, the elections official shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish a convenient number of election precincts within the affected jurisdiction.

(2) Define the precinct boundaries.

(3) Designate a polling place for each precinct.

(4) Appoint for each precinct a precinct board pursuant to Sections 12302 to 12304, inclusive.

(5) Notify the members of each precinct board
 of their appointment and the location of the precinct and polling place where they will serve.

(b) The elections official, in establishing precincts and defining their boundaries, shall, to the extent practicable, provide for a single polling place where a voter entitled to vote in more than one district may cast all of his or her ballots.

(c) In a landowner voting district, the county elections official shall designate the polling place at which a nonresident landowner shall vote.

(d) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 35.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12287.

A candidate’s residence shall not be designated as a polling place for an election at which that candidate’s name will appear on the ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12287.5.

A single-family residence shall not be designated as a polling place if elections officials determine that it has the registered address of a person who is required to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act. Elections officials shall, not more than 60 days prior to designating a single-family residence as a polling place, use the Megan’s Law Internet Web site maintained by the Department of Justice to determine if the residence has the registered address of a sex offender. In accordance with subdivision (k) of Section 290.46 of the Penal Code, an elections official who is required to register as a sex offender shall be prohibited from accessing the Megan’s Law public Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   (AB 193)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12288.

A polling place shall not be accessible by a door, window, or other opening to any place where any alcoholic beverage is sold or dispensed while the polls are open.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   (AB 2037)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Precinct Boards [12300. - 12327.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12300. - 12327.]

12300.

Any voter, or any individual who possesses the qualifications set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 12302, may file an application with the elections official for the position of precinct board member. The elections official may require the application be made on specific forms supplied by the elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (AB 817)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

The persons appointed to serve as election officers for each precinct at any election shall constitute the precinct board for that precinct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a member of a precinct board shall be a voter of the state. The member may serve only in the precinct for which his or her appointment is received.

(b) (1) In order to provide for a greater awareness of the elections process, the rights and responsibilities of voters, and the importance of participating in the electoral process, as well as to provide additional members of precinct boards, an elections official may appoint not more than five pupils per precinct to serve under the direct supervision of precinct board members designated by the elections official. A pupil may be appointed, notwithstanding his or her lack of eligibility to vote, subject to the approval of the governing board of the
 educational institution in which the pupil is enrolled, if the pupil possesses the following qualifications:

(A) Is at least 16 years of age at the time of the election for which he or she is serving as a member of a precinct board.

(B) Is a United States citizen, will be a citizen at the time of the election for which he or she is serving as a member of a precinct board, or is lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States, as defined in Section 101(a)(20) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20)).

(C) Is a pupil in good standing attending a public or private secondary educational institution.

(D) Is a pupil who has a grade point average of at least 2.5 on a 4.0 scale.

(2) A pupil appointed pursuant to this subdivision may not be used by a precinct board to tally votes.

(c) (1) In order to promote civic engagement among residents of the state and to provide additional members of precinct boards, an elections official may appoint not more than five nonvoters per precinct to serve as precinct board members. A nonvoter may be appointed, notwithstanding his or her lack of eligibility to vote, if the nonvoter possesses the following qualifications:

(A) Is lawfully
 admitted for permanent residence in the United States, as defined in Section 101(a)(20) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20)).

(B) Is otherwise eligible to register to vote pursuant to Section 2101 except for his or her lack of United States citizenship.

(2) A nonvoter appointed to a precinct board pursuant to this subdivision shall not be permitted to do either of the following:

(A) Serve as, or perform any of the duties of, the inspector of a precinct board.

(B) Tally votes for the precinct board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   (AB 554)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

(a) A person who cannot read or write the English language is not eligible to act as a member of any precinct board.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made to minimize obstacles to non-English-speaking citizens voting without assistance.

(c) (1) Where the elections official finds that citizens described in subdivision (b) approximate 3 percent or more of the voting-age residents of a precinct, or if interested citizens or organizations provided information that the elections official believes indicates a need for voting assistance for qualified
 citizens described in subdivision (b), the elections official shall make reasonable efforts to recruit elections officials who are fluent in a language used by citizens described in subdivision (b) and in English. This recruitment shall be conducted through the cooperation of interested citizens and organizations and through voluntarily donated public service notices in the media, including newspapers, radio, television, and the internet, particularly those media that serve the non-English-speaking citizens described in subdivision (b).
